Nebraska, session 109, LB1009.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1009 LB1009
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 48-119, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-119 No compensation shall be allowed for the first three seven
calendar days of disability, except as provided in section 48-120, but if
disability extends beyond the period of three seven calendar days,
compensation shall begin on the fourth eighth calendar day of disability,
except that if such disability continues for two six weeks or longer,
compensation shall be computed from the date disability began. For
purposes of this section, a partial day of disability shall be deemed a
calendar day of disability.
Sec. 2. Original section 48-119, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-